New Jersey, session 222, A3712.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    For the purposes of this act: Criminal offense means an act which constitutes a first, second, third, or fourth degree crime, a disorderly persons offense, and a petty disorderly persons offense. Intervene means come between, whether verbally or physically, in order to prevent or alter a result or course of events. Law enforcement officer means a person whose public duties include the power to act as an officer for the detection, apprehension, arrest, and conviction of offenders against the laws of this State. 2.    a.  The Attorney General shall promulgate a model policy establishing a duty to intervene for law enforcement officers in this State. (1)  The policy shall include an affirmative duty to intervene if a law enforcement officer witnesses another law enforcement officer  engage in any of the following: (a)  an unjustifiable use of force pursuant to the provisions of N.J.S.2C:3-7; (b)  a deprivation of civil rights pursuant to section 2 of P.L. 2003, c.3 (C.2C:30-6); (c)  any other act which constitutes a criminal offense in this State; and (d)  any other act requiring intervention, as determined by the Attorney General. (2)   The policy shall include disciplinary action for a law enforcement officer who fails to intervene when required under the provisions of the policy. b.    Each agency, department, or other entity that employs law enforcement officers in this State shall: (1)   adopt the policy established by the Attorney General pursuant to subsection a. of this section or a policy that is substantially identical. An entity adopting its own policy shall make application in a manner to be determined by the Attorney General for approval of the policy prior to adoption; and (2)  report on a quarterly annual basis to the Attorney General each incidence of an intervention committed by a law enforcement officer employed by the agency, department, or other entity for that time period, pursuant to the provisions set forth in the policy. c.     The Attorney General shall prepare and submit to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), an annual report, which shall summarize the quarterly reports received pursuant to subsection c. of this section. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.